West Virginia, session 2026, HB5391.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: CHAPTER 11. TAXATION. ARTICLE 21. PERSONAL INCOME TAX. §11-21-12. West Virginia adjusted gross income of resident individual. (a) General. — The West Virginia adjusted gross income of a resident individual means his or her federal adjusted gross income as defined in the laws of the United States for the taxable year with the modifications specified in this section.(b) Modifications increasing federal adjusted gross income. — There shall be added to federal adjusted gross income, unless already included therein, the following items:(1) Interest income on obligations of any state other than this state or of a political subdivision of any other state unless created by compact or agreement to which this state is a party;(2) Interest or dividend income on obligations or securities of any authority, commission or instrumentality of the United States, which the laws of the United States exempt from federal income tax but not from state income taxes;(3) Any deduction allowed when determining federal adjusted gross income for federal income tax purposes for the taxable year that is not allowed as a deduction under this article for the taxable year;(4) Interest on indebtedness incurred or continued to purchase or carry obligations or securities the income from which is exempt from tax under this article, to the extent deductible in determining federal adjusted gross income;(5) Interest on a depository institution tax-exempt savings certificate which is allowed as an exclusion from federal gross income under Section 128 of the Internal Revenue Code, for the federal taxable year;(6) The amount of a lump sum distribution for which the taxpayer has elected under Section 402(e) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, to be separately taxed for federal income tax purposes; and(7) Amounts withdrawn from a medical savings account established by or for an individual under §33-15-20 or §33-16-15 of this code that are used for a purpose other than payment of medical expenses, as defined in those sections.(c) Modifications reducing federal adjusted gross income. — There shall be subtracted from federal adjusted gross income to the extent included therein:(1) Interest income on obligations of the United States and its possessions to the extent includable in gross income for federal income tax purposes;(2) Interest or dividend income on obligations or securities of any authority, commission or instrumentality of the United States or of the State of West Virginia to the extent includable in gross income for federal income tax purposes but exempt from state income taxes under the laws of the United States or of the State of West Virginia, including federal interest or dividends paid to shareholders of a regulated investment company, under Section 852 of the Internal Revenue Code for taxable years ending after June 30, 1987;(3) Any amount included in federal adjusted gross income for federal income tax purposes for the taxable year that is not included in federal adjusted gross income under this article for the taxable year;(4) The amount of any refund or credit for overpayment of income taxes imposed by this state, or any other taxing jurisdiction, to the extent properly included in gross income for federal income tax purposes;(5) Annuities, retirement allowances, returns of contributions and any other benefit received under the West Virginia Public Employees Retirement System, and the West Virginia State Teachers Retirement System, including any survivorship annuities derived therefrom, to the extent includable in gross income for federal income tax purposes: Provided, That notwithstanding any provisions in this code to the contrary this modification shall be limited to the first $2,000 of benefits received under the West Virginia Public Employees Retirement System, the West Virginia State Teachers Retirement System and, including any survivorship annuities derived therefrom, to the extent includable in gross income for federal income tax purposes for taxable years beginning after December 31, 1986; and the first $2,000 of benefits received under any federal retirement system to which 4 U.S.C. § 111 applies: Provided, however, That the total modification under this paragraph shall not exceed $2,000 per person receiving retirement benefits and this limitation shall apply to all returns or amended returns filed after December 31, 1988;(6) Retirement income received in the form of pensions and annuities after December 31, 1979, under any West Virginia police, West Virginia Firemen’s Retirement System or the West Virginia State Police Death, Disability and Retirement Fund, the West Virginia State Police Retirement System or the West Virginia Deputy Sheriff Retirement System, including any survivorship annuities derived from any of these programs, to the extent includable in gross income for federal income tax purposes;(7)(A) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2000, and ending prior to January 1, 2003, an amount equal to two percent multiplied by the number of years of active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States of America with the product thereof multiplied by the first $30,000 of military retirement income, including retirement income from the regular Armed Forces, Reserves and National Guard paid by the United States or by this state after December 31, 2000, including any survivorship annuities, to the extent included in gross income for federal income tax purposes for the taxable year.(B) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2000, the first $20,000 of military retirement income, including retirement income from the regular Armed Forces, Reserves and National Guard paid by the United States or by this state after December 31, 2002, including any survivorship annuities, to the extent included in gross income for federal income tax purposes for the taxable year.(C) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2017, military retirement income, including retirement income from the regular Armed Forces, Reserves and National Guard paid by the United States or by this state after December 31, 2017, including any survivorship annuities, to the extent included in federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018, retirement income from the uniformed services, including the Army, Navy, Marines, Air Force, Space Force, Coast Guard, Public Health Service, National Oceanic Atmospheric Administration, reserves, and National Guard, paid by the United States or by this state after December 31, 2018, including any survivorship annuities, to the extent included in federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year.(D) In the event that any of the provisions of this subdivision are found by a court of competent jurisdiction to violate either the Constitution of this state or of the United States, or is held to be extended to persons other than specified in this subdivision, this subdivision shall become null and void by operation of law.(8) Decreasing modification for social security income.(A) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, 100 percent of the social security benefits received pursuant to Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code, including, but not limited to, social security benefits paid by the Social Security Administration as Old Age, Survivors and Disability Insurance Benefits as provided in 42 U.S.C. § 401 et. seq. or as Supplemental Security Income for the Aged, Blind, and Disabled as provided in 42 U.S.C. § 1381 et. seq., included in federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year shall be allowed as a decreasing modification from federal adjusted gross income when determining West Virginia taxable income subject to the tax imposed by this article, subject to the limitation in §11-21-12(c)(8)(B) of this code.(B) The deduction allowed by §11-21-12(c)(8)(A) of this code are allowable only when the federal adjusted gross income of a married couple filing a joint return does not exceed $100,000, or $50,000 in the case of a single individual or a married individual filing a separate return.(C) For taxable years beginning on and after January 1, 2024, 35 percent of the amount of social security benefits received pursuant to Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code, including, but not limited to, social security benefits paid by the Social Security Administration as Old Age, Survivors and Disability Insurance Benefits as provided in 42 U.S.C. § 401 et. seq. or as Supplemental Security Income for the Aged, Blind, and Disabled as provided in 42 U.S.C. § 1381 et. seq., included in federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year shall be allowed as a decreasing modification from federal adjusted gross income when determining West Virginia taxable income subject to the tax imposed by this article, subject to the limitation in §11-21-12(c)(8)(F) of this code.(D) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, 65 percent of the social security benefits received pursuant to Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code, including, but not limited to, social security benefits paid by the Social Security Administration as Old Age, Survivors and Disability Insurance Benefits as provided in 42 U.S.C. § 401 et. seq. or as Supplemental Security Income for the Aged, Blind, and Disabled as provided in 42 U.S.C. § 1381 et. seq., included in federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year shall be allowed as a decreasing modification from federal adjusted gross income when determining West Virginia taxable income subject to the tax imposed by this article, subject to the limitation in §11-21-12(c)(8)(F) of this code.(E) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, 100 percent of the social security benefits received pursuant to Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code, including, but not limited to, social security benefits paid by the Social Security Administration as Old Age, Survivors and Disability Insurance Benefits as provided in 42 U.S.C. § 401 et. seq. or as Supplemental Security Income for the Aged, Blind, and Disabled as provided in 42 U.S.C. 1381 et. seq., included in federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year shall be allowed as a decreasing modification from federal adjusted gross income when determining West Virginia taxable income subject to the tax imposed by this article, subject to the limitation in §11-21-12(c)(8)(F) of this code.(F) The deduction allowed by §11-21-12(c)(8)(C), §11-21-12(c)(8)(D), and §11-21-12(c)(8)(E) of this code are allowable only when the federal adjusted gross income of a married couple filing a joint return exceeds $100,000, or $50,000 in the case of a single individual or a married individual filing a separate return.(9) Federal adjusted gross income in the amount of $8,000 received from any source after December 31, 1986, by any person who has attained the age of 65 on or before the last day of the taxable year, or by any person certified by proper authority as permanently and totally disabled, regardless of age, on or before the last day of the taxable year, to the extent includable in federal adjusted gross income for federal tax purposes: Provided, That if a person has a medical certification from a prior year and he or she is still permanently and totally disabled, a copy of the original certificate is acceptable as proof of disability. A copy of the form filed for the federal disability income tax exclusion is acceptable: Provided, however, That:(i) Where the total modification under subdivisions (1), (2), (5), (6), (7), and (8) of this subsection is $8,000 per person or more, no deduction shall be allowed under this subdivision; and(ii) Where the total modification under subdivisions (1), (2), (5), (6), (7), and (8) of this subsection is less than $8,000 per person, the total modification allowed under this subdivision for all gross income received by that person shall be limited to the difference between $8,000 and the sum of modifications under subdivisions (1), (2), (5), (6), (7), and (8) of this subsection;(10) Federal adjusted gross income in the amount of $8,000 received from any source after December 31, 1986, by the surviving spouse of any person who had attained the age of 65 or who had been certified as permanently and totally disabled, to the extent includable in federal adjusted gross income for federal tax purposes: Provided, That:(i) Where the total modification under subdivisions (1), (2), (5), (6), (7), and (8) of this subsection is $8,000 or more, no deduction shall be allowed under this subdivision; and(ii) Where the total modification under subdivisions (1), (2), (5), (6), (7), and (8) of this subsection is less than $8,000 per person, the total modification allowed under this subdivision for all gross income received by that person shall be limited to the difference between $8,000 and the sum of subdivisions (1), (2), (5), (6), (7), and (8) of this subsection;(11) Contributions from any source to a medical savings account established by or for the individual pursuant to §33-15-20 or §33-16-15 of this code, plus interest earned on the account, to the extent includable in federal adjusted gross income for federal tax purposes: Provided, That the amount subtracted pursuant to this subdivision for any one taxable year may not exceed $2,000 plus interest earned on the account. For married individuals filing a joint return, the maximum deduction is computed separately for each individual; and (12) Any other income which this state is prohibited from taxing under the laws of the United States including, but not limited to, tier I retirement benefits as defined in Section 86(d)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code.(d) Modification for West Virginia fiduciary adjustment. — There shall be added to or subtracted from federal adjusted gross income, as the case may be, the taxpayer’s share, as beneficiary of an estate or trust, of the West Virginia fiduciary adjustment determined under §11-21-19 of this code.(e) Partners and S corporation shareholders. — The amounts of modifications required to be made under this section by a partner or an S corporation shareholder, which relate to items of income, gain, loss or deduction of a partnership or an S corporation, shall be determined under §11-21-17 of this code.(f) Husband and wife. — If husband and wife determine their federal income tax on a joint return but determine their West Virginia income taxes separately, they shall determine their West Virginia adjusted gross incomes separately as if their federal adjusted gross incomes had been determined separately.(g) Effective date. –(1) Changes in the language of this section enacted in the year 2000 shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2000.(2) Changes in the language of this section enacted in the year 2002 shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2002.(3) Changes in the language of this section enacted in the year 2019 shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018.(4) Changes in the language of this section enacted in the year 2024 shall apply retroactively to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2023.(h) For taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2026, retirement income received from the Emergency Medical Services Retirement System (EMSRS) shall be exempt from West Virginia personal income tax, in whole, without limitation on amount.(i) The Tax Commissioner shall issue any rules necessary for administration of this exemption, and shall update relevant forms and instructions accordingly. CHAPTER 16. PUBLIC HEALTH. ARTICLE 5V. EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES RETIREMENT SYSTEM ACT. §16-5V-25. Additional death benefits and scholarships -- Dependent children. (a) In addition to the spouse death benefits in this article, the surviving spouse is entitled to receive and there shall be paid to the spouse $100 monthly for each dependent child.(b) If the surviving spouse dies or if there is no surviving spouse, the fund shall pay monthly to each dependent child a sum equal to one hundred percent of the spouse's entitlement under this article divided by the number of dependent children. If there is neither a surviving spouse nor a dependent child, the fund shall pay in equal monthly installments to the dependent parents of the deceased member during their joint lifetimes a sum equal to the amount which a surviving spouse, without children, would have received: Provided, That when there is only one dependent parent surviving, that parent is entitled to receive during his or her lifetime one-half the amount which both parents, if living, would have been entitled to receive: Provided, however, That if there is no surviving spouse, dependent child or dependent parent of the deceased member, the accumulated contributions shall be paid to a named beneficiary or beneficiaries: Provided further, That if there is no surviving spouse, dependent child or dependent parent of the deceased member, or any named beneficiary or beneficiaries, then the accumulated contributions shall be paid to the estate of the deceased member.(c) Any person qualifying as a dependent child under this section, in addition to any other benefits due under this or other sections of this article, is entitled to receive a scholarship to be applied to the career development education of that person. This sum, up to but not exceeding $6,000 per year, shall be paid from the fund to any university or college in this state or to any trade or vocational school or other entity in this state approved by the board to offset the expenses of tuition, room and board, books, fees or other costs incurred in a course of study at any of these institutions so long as the recipient makes application to the board on an approved form and under rules provided by the board and maintains scholastic eligibility as defined by the institution or the board. The board may propose legislative rules for promulgation in accordance with article three, chapter twenty-nine-a of this code which define age requirements, physical and mental requirements, scholastic eligibility, disbursement methods, institutional qualifications and other requirements as necessary and not inconsistent with this section. Scholarship benefits awarded pursuant to this subsection are not subject to division or payable to an alternate payee by any Qualified Domestic Relations Order.(d) “Final average salary” means the average of the highest annual compensation received by a member during any five years of credited service, whether or not those years are consecutive. This shall replace any prior calculation method based solely on the final three or five consecutive years.(e) The Board of Trustees of the West Virginia Emergency Medical Services Retirement System shall adopt any rules necessary to implement this change and ensure its application is retroactive to all active members as of July 1, 2026, and forward. §16-5V-27. Double death benefits prohibited. (a) A surviving spouse is not entitled to receive simultaneous death benefits under this article as a result of the death of two or more members to whom the spouse was married. Any spouse who becomes eligible for a subsequent death benefit under this article while receiving a death benefit under this article shall receive the higher benefit, but not both. (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a retired member of the Emergency Medical Services Retirement System may return to employment as an emergency medical services provider in a designated area of need without limitation on annual hours worked, and without suspension or reduction of retirement benefits.(c) The Office of Emergency Medical Services shall define “area of need” by rule, considering factors such as provider shortages, response times, and community health indicators. Article 5EE. EMS Retirement Equity, Tax Relief, and Workforce Support Act. §16-5EE-1. Short Title. This Act shall be known and cited as the "EMS Retirement Equity, Tax Relief, and Workforce Support Act." §16-5EE-2. Legislative Findings. The Legislature finds that:Emergency Medical Services personnel provide critical, life-saving care under high-risk and high-stress conditions throughout their careers.The current retirement formula for EMSRS does not adequately reflect the total value or burden of EMS service.Aligning retirement benefits with a member’s five highest-earning years recognizes peak contributions and supports long-term recruitment and retention.Exempting EMSRS retirement income from state taxation is a fair and reasonable acknowledgment of public service and will promote retirement security.Removing the 1040-hour limitation for retired EMS professionals returning to work in areas of need will help address workforce shortages and ensure timely emergency response for West Virginia communities. §16-5EE-3. Severability. If any provision of this Act or its application to any person or circumstance is found to be invalid, the remainder of the Act and its application shall remain in full force and effect. §16-5EE-4. Effective Date. This article shall take effect on July 1, 2026.